Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-1079.03
Grow, defined.

Grow shall mean to produce
a plant or plant product, by propagation or cultivation, including, but not
limited to, division, transplant, seed, or cutting, generally over a period
of one year or greater. Grow does not include transferring nursery stock from
one container to another or potting bare-root nursery stock, if the stock
will be distributed within twelve months.

Laws 2013, LB68, § 4.